Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1351.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6309.3. Racing and noise violations.(a) Authority to immobilize or tow.--A police officer or authorized agent of a city of the first class is authorized to immobilize or, in the interest of public safety, tow and impound a motor vehicle if the vehicle is:(1) observed participating in a drag race or speed competition prohibited under section 3367 (relating to racing on highways and trafficways);(2) operated in concert with other vehicles in a reckless manner that interferes with public safety or quiet enjoyment of residential neighborhoods;123456789101112131415161718 (3) Operated in violation of section 3722 (relating to off-road vehicles in urban municipalities);(4) equipped with an exhaust system or modification in violation of section 4523 (relating to exhaust systems, mufflers and noise control) or other applicable law and is operated between the hours of 10 p.m. and 6 a.m.; or(5) displaying a registration plate in violation of section 7124 (relating to fraudulent use or removal of registration plate).(b) Notice to owner.--(1) At the time of impoundment, the police officer or authorized agent shall provide written notice to the driver or registered owner of the vehicle stating the reason for impoundment and the procedure for reclaiming the vehicle.(2) If the registered owner is not present at the time of impoundment, the notice under paragraph (1) shall be sent by first class mail to the registered owner.(c) Recovery of vehicle.--The owner may recover the vehicle upon:(1) Payment of all towing and storage costs.(2) Payment of a civil penalty not exceeding $500 for a first offense and $1,000 for subsequent offenses.(3) Demonstration of compliance with equipment requirements, if applicable.(d) Administrative hearing.--An owner may request an administrative hearing with the Philadelphia Traffic Court or another appropriate adjudicative authority within 10 days of impoundment to contest the impoundment. If the owner is found not to be in violation of this section, all costs shall be refunded to the owner.20260SB1351PN1748 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) Disposition of fees.--All penalties collected under this section shall be deposited into a special fund of the city to support traffic safety and enforcement initiatives.(f) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall preclude prosecution for violations of this title or local ordinances.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1351PN1748 - 3 - 123456